Hawaii statutes.
[§11-372] Reporting loan; written
loan agreement. (a) Every loan shall be reported as provided in section
11-333.

(b) Every loan in excess of $100 shall be
documented as provided in section 11-333.

(c) A loan shall be treated as a contribution,
subject to all relevant provisions of this part, if the loan is not reported or
documented as provided in section 11-333. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next